Washington statutes.
RCW 40.04.090

Legislative journals—Distribution, sale, exchange.

The house and senate journals shall be distributed and sold by the chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate as follows:

(1) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, sets shall be distributed as follows: One to each requesting official whose office is created by the Constitution, and one to each requesting state department director; two copies to the state library; ten copies to the state law library; two copies to the University of Washington library; one to the King county law library; one to the Washington State University library; one to the library of each of the regional universities and to The Evergreen State College; one each to the law library of any accredited law school in this state; and one to each free public library in the state that requests it.

(2) House and senate journals of the preceding regular session during an odd- or even-numbered year, and of any intervening special session, shall be provided for use of legislators and legislative staff in such numbers as directed by the chief clerk of the house of representatives and secretary of the senate.

(3) Surplus sets of the house and senate journals shall be sold and delivered by the chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate at a price set by them after consulting with the state printer to determine reasonable costs associated with the production of the journals, and the proceeds therefrom shall be paid to the state treasurer for the general fund.

(4) The chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate may exchange copies of the house and senate journals for similar journals of other states, territories, and governments, or for other legal materials, and make such other and further distribution of them as in their judgment seems proper.

(5) Periodically the chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate may canvas those entitled to receive copies under this section, and may reduce or eliminate the number of copies distributed to anyone who so concurs.

[ 1995 c 24 s 4; 1993 c 169 s 1; 1982 1st ex.s. c 32 s 2; 1980 c 87 s 13; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 95; 1973 c 33 s 2; 1941 c 150 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 8217-5.]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.